Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.011, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 48. new text end new text begin Housing need percentage. new text end new text begin "Housing need percentage" is equal to the percentage of a city's city revenue need under subdivision 34 that is due to the following two factors: new text end new text begin (1) its pre-1940 housing percentage under subdivision 30; and new text end new text begin (2) its percentage of housing built between 1940 and 1970, the sum of which is equal to 100 times the most recent count by the United States Bureau of the Census of all housing units in the city built after 1939 but before 1970, divided by the total number of all housing units in the city. Housing units includes both occupied and vacant housing units as defined by the federal census. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 477A.013, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 15. new text end new text begin Dedicated use of city aid. new text end new text begin A city receiving aid under subdivision 9 in any year must dedicate an amount of aid equal to the city's housing need percentage under section 477A.011, subdivision 48, multiplied by its city formula aid amount to fund housing development, redevelopment, and rehabilitation programs. If the amount calculated under this subdivision is less than $100, the minimum dedication amount of aid for these programs is zero. The amount of aid going to housing programs under this subdivision is in addition to any other money from grants, fees, or other sources that are dedicated to housing programs. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for aids payable in calendar year 2026 and thereafter. new text end